Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,127
Class V school district; sale of site; proceeds; use.

Whenever it is determined by the board of education of a Class V school district that the real estate described as Capitol Square, being a subdivision in the city of Omaha, Douglas County, Nebraska, and being within the northwest quarter of the northwest quarter of section twenty-two, township fifteen, north, range thirteen, east of the sixth principal meridian, together with the south twelve feet of vacated Davenport Street adjoining such premises on the north, which was deeded by the State of Nebraska to the city in which such school district is located, for educational purposes, is no longer suitable for such use, and that it would be in the best educational interests of such city and school district that such real estate and the buildings and improvements erected and maintained thereon by the school district be sold, and the proceeds of such sale used for the purchase of another school site and the erection of such a school building or buildings thereon as are authorized under sections 79-10,127 to 79-10,135, such property may be sold pursuant to the provisions of such sections or pursuant to section 79-10,136, notwithstanding restrictions in the original deed to the city prohibiting the sale and conveyance of such property.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 1, p. 984;

Laws 1982, LB 845, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1061;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 773.